src/morphology/stems/suffixes.lexc
lahjaisuus+A:lahjaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
lahkeinen+A:lahkei  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
laivainen+A:laivai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lajinen+A:laji  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lakinen+A:laki  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lakkinen+A:lakki  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lankainen+A:lankai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
lanteinen+A:lantei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lantioinen+A:lantioi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lapainen+A:lapai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lapsinen+A:lapsi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
laskoksinen+A:laskoksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
laskuinen+A:laskui  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
latvainen+A:latvai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
latvuksinen+A:latvuksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lauseinen+A:lausei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lavainen+A:lavai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lehdykkäinen+A:lehdykkäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
lehtinen+A:lehti     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
lehväinen+A:lehväi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
leimainen+A:leimai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lentoinen+A:lentoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
leukainen+A:leukai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
levikkinen+A:levikki     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
levintäinen+A:levintäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
levyinen+A:levyi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
liepeinen+A:liepei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
lierinen+A:lieri     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
liikenteinen+A:liikentei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
liikkeinen+A:liikkei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
liikkeisyys+N:liikkeisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
linjainen+A:linjai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
loiminen+A:loimi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lokeroinen+A:lokeroi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
loppuinen+A:loppui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
luistoinen+A:luistoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
luokkainen+A:luokkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
luokkaisuus+A:luokkaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
luokkalainen+A:luokkalai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
luuloinen+A:luuloi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
luuloisuus+A:luuloisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
luustoinen+A:luustoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
lypsyinen+A:lypsyi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
lyöntinen+A:lyönti     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
lähtöinen+A:lähtöi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
lähtöisyys+N:lähtöisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
lämmitteinen+A:lämmittei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
maalinen+A:maali  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
maastoinen+A:maastoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
mahainen+A:mahai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
maineinen+A:mainei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
markkanen+A:markka  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
mastoinen+A:mastoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
mastoinen+A:mastoi  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
matkainen+A:matkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
menekkinen+A:menekki     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
merkintäinen+A:merkintäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
merkityksinen+A:merkityksi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
merkityksisyys+N:merkityksisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
metri+N:metr     NOUN_TYYLI  ;
mielinen+A:mieli     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
mielisesti+Adv:mielisesti     ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
mielisyys+N:mielisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
mietteinen+A:miettei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
mikko+N:mik  NOUN_UKKO  ;
minuuttinen+A:minuutti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
mittakaavainen+A:mittakaavai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
moottorinen+A:moottori  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
muistinen+A:muisti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
muistisuus+A:muistisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
muistoinen+A:muistoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
mukulainen+A:mukulai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
munainen+A:munai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
murteinen+A:murtei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
myötäisyys+N:myötäisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
naamainen+A:naamai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
nahkaisuus+A:nahkaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
napainen+A:napai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
nappinen+A:nappi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
nenäinen+A:nenäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
neuleinen+A:neulei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
neuvoinen+A:neuvoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
nidoksinen+A:nidoksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
niekka+A:niek  NOUN_LUOKKA  ;
nieluinen+A:nielui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
niitinen+A:niiti     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
nilkkainen+A:nilkkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
niskainen+A:niskai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
nivelinen+N:niveli     NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
nokkainen+A:nokkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
nopeuksinen+A:nopeuksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
nousuinen+A:nousui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
näkemyksinen+A:näkemyksi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
näyttöinen+A:näyttöi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
ohimoinen+A:ohimoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ohjauksinen+A:ohjauksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ohjelmainen+A:ohjelmai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
oktaaninen+A:oktaani  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
olkaiminen+A:olkaimi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
olkainen+A:olkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
omainen+A:omai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
omaisesti+Adv:omaisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
omaisuus+A:omaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
omisteinen+A:omistei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ompeleinen+A:ompelei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
onninen+A:onni  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
opettajainen+A:opettajai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
oppinen+A:oppi  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
oppisuus+A:oppisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
osainen+A:osai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
osaisuus+A:osaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
osastoinen+A:osastoi  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
otsainen+A:otsai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
otteinen+A:ottei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ovinen+A:ovi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
paikkainen+A:paikkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
paikkalainen+A:paikkalai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
painoisesti+Adv:painoisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
painoisuus+A:painoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
painotteinen+A:painottei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
painotteisesti+Adv:painotteisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
painotteisuus+A:painotteisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
paitainen+A:paitai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
pakoinen+A:pakoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
palkkainen+A:palkkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
palkkaisuus+A:palkkaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
palmikkoinen+A:palmikkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
palstainen+A:palstai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
paniaiset+A:paniai@U.PLURALE.TANTUM@  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
panija+A:panij NOUN_SOITTAJA  ;
parinen+A:pari  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
peltoinen+A:peltoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
penninen+A:penni     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
perheinen+A:perhei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
periaatteinen+A:periaattei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
persoonainen+A:persoonai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
perusteinen+A:perustei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
peräinen+A:peräi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
peräisyys+N:peräisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
pigmenttinen+A:pigmentti     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
piippuinen+A:piippui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
piirteinen+A:piirtei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
pilttuinen+A:pilttui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
pinnoitteinen+A:pinnoittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
pintainen+A:pintai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
pintaisuus+A:pintaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
pitoinen+A:pitoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
pohjainen+A:pohjai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
pohjaisesti+Adv:pohjaisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
pohjaisuus+A:pohjaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
pohkeinen+A:pohkei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
polvinen+A:polvi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
poskinen+A:poski  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
potkuinen+A:potkui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
potkurinen+A:potkuri  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
povinen+A:povi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
puheinen+A:puhei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
puitteinen+A:puittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
pukuinen+A:pukui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
punontainen+A:punontai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
puolainen+A:puolai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
puoleisesti+Adv:puoleisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
puolueinen+A:puoluei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
purjeinen+A:purjei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
puseroinen+A:puseroi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
pylväinen+A:pylväi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
pyrstöinen+A:pyrstöi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
pyöräinen+A:pyöräi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
päinen+A:päi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
päiväinen+N:päiväi     NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
päällyksinen+A:päällyksi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
päällysteinen+A:päällystei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
päärmeinen+A:päärmei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
pääsyinen+A:pääsyi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
päätteinen+A:päättei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
pöksyinen+A:pöksyi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
raajainen+A:raajai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
rahoitteinen+A:rahoittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
rajainen+A:rajai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
rajoitteinen+A:rajoittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
rakentaminen+A:rakentami  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
rantainen+A:rantai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ratainen+A:ratai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ravinteinen+A:ravintei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ravintoinen+A:ravintoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
reitinen+A:reiti     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
renkainen+A:renkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
reunainen+A:reunai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
reunuksinen+A:reunuksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
rintainen+A:rintai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
rinteinen+A:rintei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
rivinen+A:rivi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
runkoinen+A:runkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ruokainen+A:ruokai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ruokaisuus+A:ruokaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
ruumiinen+A:ruumii  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ryhtinen+A:ryhti     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
räystäinen+A:räystäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
sanaisesti+Adv:sanaisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
sanaisuus+A:sanaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
sankainen+A:sankai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
sarjainen+A:sarjai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sarjalainen+A:sarjalai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sarvinen+A:sarvi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
satainen+A:satai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
seinäinen+A:seinäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
sekoitteinen+A:sekoittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sekuntinen+A:sekunti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
selitteinen+A:selittei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
selkoinen+A:selkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
selkäinen+A:selkäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
selkäisesti+Adv:selkäisesti     ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
selkäisyys+N:selkäisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
senttinen+A:sentti     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
seosteinen+A:seostei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sidoksinen+A:sidoksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sieluinen+A:sielui  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
sieluisuus+A:sieluisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
siemeninen+A:siemeni     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
sieraiminen+A:sieraimi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sietoinen+A:sietoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
siirtoinen+A:siirtoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
siittoinen+A:siittoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sijoitteinen+A:sijoittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
silavainen+A:silavai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
silmukkainen+A:silmukkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
silmäinen+A:silmäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
silmäisesti+Adv:silmäisesti     ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
silmäisyys+N:silmäisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
sirkkainen+A:sirkkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sisuinen+A:sisui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sisustainen+A:sisustai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sisusteinen+A:sisustei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
siteinen+A:sitei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
sivelteinen+A:siveltei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
sivuinen+A:sivui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
solkinen+A:solki  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
soluinen+A:solui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
somisteinen+A:somistei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
soppinen+A:soppi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sorminen+A:sormi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
soutuinen+A:soutui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sovitteinen+A:sovittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
suhtainen+A:suhtai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
suhtaisuus+A:suhtaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
suhteinen+A:suhtei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
suinen+A:sui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sukainen+A:sukai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sukuisuus+A:sukuisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
sulatteinen+A:sulattei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
sulkainen+A:sulkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
summainen+A:summai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
suojattu+A:suojat  ADJ_VIMMATTU  ;
sydäminen+A:sydämi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
sydämisyys+N:sydämisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
sykkeinen+A:sykkei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
sykkeisyys+N:sykkeisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
syntyinen+A:syntyi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
syntyisesti+Adv:syntyisesti     ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
syntyisyys+N:syntyisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
sytytteinen+A:sytyttei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
sytytyksinen+A:sytytyksi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
syöttöinen+A:syöttöi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
säesteinen+A:säestei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
säestyksinen+A:säestyksi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
säkeinen+A:säkei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
säkeistöinen+A:säkeistöi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
sälpä+N:säl  NOUN_LEIPÄ  ;
särmäinen+A:särmäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
säteinen+A:sätei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
sävytteinen+A:sävyttei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
säädäntö+N:säädän  NOUN_KÄÄNTÖ  ;
säärinen+N:sääri     NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
säärisyys+N:säärisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
sääteinen+N:säätei     NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
